ja: ドラムキットに含まれるアイテム: バスドラムペダル付き; キャリングケース/バッグ付き; シンバル付き; ドラムヘッド付き; ドラムモジュール付き (電子); ドラムスティック付き; ハードウェア付き (スタンド); ハイハットスタンド付き; キックペダル付き (電子); 練習用パッド付き; ラックシステム付き; シェルパックのみ (ドラムのみ); スネアスタンド付き; スローン付き; その他
nl: Drumstel inbegrepen items: Inclusief basdrumpedaal; Inclusief draagkoffers/-tassen; Inclusief bekkens; Inclusief drumvellen; Inclusief drummodule (elektronisch); Inclusief drumstokken; Inclusief hardware (standaards); Inclusief hihatstandaard; Inclusief kickpedaal/-pedalen (elektronisch); Inclusief oefenpad; Inclusief racksysteem; Alleen shellset (alleen drums); Inclusief snarestandaard; Inclusief drumkruk; Anders
it: kit inclusa articolo: Pedale cassa incluso; Custodie/borse incluse; Piatti inclusi; Pelli incluse; Modulo sonoro incluso (elettronico); Bacchette incluse; Hardware incluso (aste); Asta hi-hat inclusa; Pedali cassa inclusi (elettronica); Pad da allenamento incluso; Sistema rack incluso; Solo shell pack (solo fusti); Asta rullante inclusa; Seggiolino incluso; Altro
sv: Delar som ingår i trumset: Bastrumpedal ingår; Bärväskor/fodral ingår; Cymbaler ingår; Trumskinn ingår; Trummodul ingår (elektronisk); Trumpinnar ingår; Utrustning ingår (stativ); Hi-hat-stativ ingår; Kickpedal(er) ingår (elektroniska); Övningsplatta ingår; Racksystem ingår; Endast trumstommar (endast trummor); Virvelstativ ingår; Trumstol ingår; Övrigt
lt-LT: Įtraukti būgnų rinkinio daiktai: Pridedamas boso būgno pedalas; Pridedami dėklai / krepšiai; Pridedamos lėkštės; Pridedami būgnų plastikai; Pridedamas būgnų modulis (elektroninis); Pridedamos būgnų lazdelės; Pridedama techninė įranga (stovai); Pridedamas „hi-hat“ stovas; Pridedamas boso pedalas (-ai) (elektroninis); Pridedamas treniruočių padas; Pridedama stelažų sistema; Tik korpusų rinkinys (tik būgnai); Pridedamas mažojo būgno stovas; Pridedama kėdutė; Kita
pl: Elementy zestawu perkusyjnego w zestawie: Pedał bębna basowego w zestawie; Futerały/pokrowce w zestawie; Talerze w zestawie; Naciągi w zestawie; Moduł perkusyjny w zestawie (elektroniczny); Pałki perkusyjne w zestawie; Osprzęt w zestawie (statywy); Statyw do hi-hatu w zestawie; Pedał(y) stopy w zestawie (elektroniczny); Pad treningowy w zestawie; Rama perkusyjna w zestawie; Tylko shell set (same bębny); Statyw do werbla w zestawie; Stołek perkusyjny w zestawie; Inne
cs: Součásti zahrnuté v sadě bicích: Včetně pedálu k basovému bubnu; Včetně přepravních pouzder / tašek; Včetně činelů; Včetně blan na bubny; Včetně zvukového modulu (elektronické); Včetně paliček; Včetně hardwaru (stojanů); Včetně stojanu na hi-hat; Včetně pedálů ke kick padu (elektronické); Včetně tréninkového padu; Včetně rampového systému; Pouze shell pack (jen bubny); Včetně stojanu na snare; Včetně stoličky; Ostatní
sl-SI: Priloženi elementi v kompletu bobnov: Vključen pedal za bas boben; Vključene torbe za prenašanje; Vključene činele; Vključene opne za bobne; Vključen modul za bobne (elektronski); Vključene bobnarske palčke; Vključena strojna oprema (stojala); Vključeno stojalo za hi-hat; Vključeni pedali za bas boben (elektronski); Vključena vadbena blazinica; Vključen sistem ogrodja; Samo osnovni komplet (samo bobni); Vključeno stojalo za mali boben; Vključen stol; Drugo
sk-SK: Položky, ktoré sú súčasťou súpravy bubna: Pedál na basový bubon je súčasťou balenia; Prepravné puzdrá/tašky sú súčasťou balenia; Činely sú súčasťou balenia; Blany na bicie sú súčasťou balenia; Bicí modul je súčasťou balenia (elektronické); Paličky sú súčasťou balenia; Hardvér je súčasťou balenia (stojany); Stojan na hi-hat je súčasťou balenia; Kopákový pedál je súčasťou balenia (elektronické); Cvičný pad je súčasťou balenia; Rampový systém je súčasťou balenia; Len sada bubnov bez hardvéru (shell pack); Stojan na malý bubon je súčasťou balenia; Stolička je súčasťou balenia; Iné
th: อุปกรณ์ที่รวมมาในชุดกลอง: รวมกระเดื่องกลองเบส; รวมเคส/กระเป๋าพกพา; รวมฉาบ; รวมหนังกลอง; รวมโมดูลกลอง (ไฟฟ้า); รวมไม้กลอง; รวมฮาร์ดแวร์ (ขาตั้ง); รวมขาตั้งไฮแฮต; รวมกระเดื่องกลอง (ไฟฟ้า); รวมแป้นซ้อมตี; รวมระบบชั้นวาง; เฉพาะชุดกลอง (ตัวกลองเท่านั้น); รวมขาตั้งสแนร์; รวมเก้าอี้กลอง; อื่นๆ
en: Drum kit included items: Bass drum pedal included; Carrying cases/bags included; Cymbals included; Drum heads included; Drum module included (electronic); Drum sticks included; Hardware included (stands); Hi-hat stand included; Kick pedal(s) included (electronic); Practice pad included; Rack system included; Shell pack only (drums only); Snare stand included; Throne included; Other
tr: Davul setiyle birlikte sunulan parçalar: Bas davul pedalı dahil; Taşıma kılıfları/çantaları dahil; Ziller dahil; Davul derileri dahil; Davul modülü dahil (elektronik); Bateri bagetleri dahil; Donanım dahil (standlar); Hi-hat standı dahil; Kick pedalları dahil (elektronik); Çalışma pedi dahil; Raf sistemi dahil; Sadece shell pack (sadece davullar); Trampet standı dahil; Tabure dahil; Diğer
fr: Éléments fournis avec le kit de batterie: Pédale de grosse caisse incluse; Étuis/housses de transport inclus; Cymbales incluses; Peaux de batterie incluses; Module de batterie inclus (électronique); Baguettes de batterie incluses; Matériel inclus (pieds); Pied de charleston inclus; Pédale(s) de grosse caisse incluse(s) (électronique); Pad d’entraînement inclus; Système de rack inclus; Fûts uniquement (batterie seule); Pied de caisse claire inclus; Siège inclus; Autre
bg-BG: Включени елементи в комплекта барабани: Включен педал за бас барабан; Включени калъфи/чанти за пренасяне; Включени чинели; Включени кожи за барабани; Включен звуков модул (електронни); Включени палки за барабани; Включен хардуер (стойки); Включена стойка за фус машина; Включен(и) педал(и) за бас каса (електронни); Включен тренировъчен пад; Включена рамкова система; Комплект само с барабани (shell pack); Включена стойка за соло барабан; Включено столче; Друго
de: Im Drum-Kit enthaltene Artikel: Inklusive Bassdrum-Pedal; Inklusive Transportkoffer/-taschen; Inklusive Becken; Inklusive Felle; Inklusive Drum-Modul (elektronisch); Inklusive Drumsticks; Inklusive Hardware (Stative); Inklusive Hi-Hat-Stativ; Inklusive Kick-Pedal(e) (elektronisch); Inklusive Practice-Pad; Inklusive Rack-System; Nur Kesselsatz (nur Trommeln); Inklusive Snare-Stativ; Inklusive Hocker; Sonstige
zh-CN: 鼓套件所含配件: 含低音鼓踏板; 含便携箱/包; 含镲片; 含鼓皮; 含鼓音源（电子鼓）; 含鼓槌; 含硬件（支架）; 含踩镲支架; 含底鼓踏板（电子鼓）; 含哑鼓垫; 含支架系统; 仅鼓腔套装（仅鼓）; 含小军鼓支架; 含鼓凳; 其他
fi: Rumpusetin mukana tulevat osat: Sisältää bassorumpupedaalin; Sisältää kantokotelot/-kassit; Sisältää symbaalit; Sisältää rumpukalvot; Sisältää rumpumoduulin (elektroninen); Sisältää rumpukapulat; Sisältää laitteiston (telineet); Sisältää hi-hat-telineen; Sisältää bassorumpupedaalin/-pedaalit (elektroninen); Sisältää harjoitusalustan; Sisältää räkkijärjestelmän; Vain runkopakkaus (vain rummut); Sisältää virvelitelineen; Sisältää rumpujakkaran; Muu
da: Indhold i trommesættet: Stortrommepedal medfølger; Bæretasker/tasker medfølger; Bækkener medfølger; Trommeskind medfølger; Trommemodul medfølger (elektronisk); Trommestikker medfølger; Hardware medfølger (stativer); Hi-hat-stativ medfølger; Stortrommepedal(er) medfølger (elektronisk); Øveplade medfølger; Racksystem medfølger; Kun kedelsæt (kun trommer); Lilletrommestativ medfølger; Trommestol medfølger; Andet
nb: Trommesett inkludert: Stortrommepedal inkludert; Bærevesker/-bager inkludert; Cymbaler inkludert; Trommeskinn inkludert; Trommemodul inkludert (elektronisk); Trommestikker inkludert; Hardware inkludert (stativer); Hi-hat-stativ inkludert; Stortrommepedal(er) inkludert (elektronisk); Øvingspad inkludert; Racksystem inkludert; Kun shell-pack (kun trommer); Skarptrommestativ inkludert; Trommestol inkludert; Annet
ro-RO: Articole incluse în setul de tobe: Pedală pentru toba mare inclusă; Huse/genți de transport incluse; Cinele incluse; Fețe de tobe incluse; Modul de tobe inclus (electronic); Bețe de tobe incluse; Hardware inclus (stative); Stativ pentru fus-cinel inclus; Pedală/pedale pentru toba mare inclusă/incluse (electronic); Pad de antrenament inclus; Sistem rack inclus; Pachet doar cu tobe (shell pack); Stativ pentru premier inclus; Scaun de tobe inclus; Altele
el: Αντικείμενα που περιλαμβάνονται στο ντραμκιτ: Περιλαμβάνεται πεντάλ κάσας; Περιλαμβάνονται θήκες/τσάντες μεταφοράς; Περιλαμβάνονται πιατίνια; Περιλαμβάνονται μεμβράνες τυμπάνων; Περιλαμβάνεται μονάδα ήχου τυμπάνων (ηλεκτρονική); Περιλαμβάνονται μπαγκέτες; Περιλαμβάνεται υλικός εξοπλισμός (βάσεις); Περιλαμβάνεται βάση hi-hat; Περιλαμβάνονται πεντάλ κάσας (ηλεκτρονικά); Περιλαμβάνεται pad εξάσκησης; Περιλαμβάνεται σύστημα rack; Μόνο πακέτο κελύφους (μόνο τύμπανα); Περιλαμβάνεται βάση ταμπούρου; Περιλαμβάνεται κάθισμα; Άλλο
es: Artículos del kit de batería incluidos: Pedal de bombo incluido; Estuches/bolsas de transporte incluidos; Platillos incluidos; Parches incluidos; Módulo de batería incluido (electrónica); Baquetas incluidas; Hardware incluido (soportes); Soporte de hi-hat incluido; Pedal(es) de bombo incluido(s) (electrónica); Pad de práctica incluido; Sistema de rack incluido; Solo pack de cascos (solo tambores); Soporte de redoblante incluido; Sillín incluido; Otro
hu: Dobkészletbe tartozó tételek: Lábgéppel; Hordozótokokkal/táskákkal; Cintányérokkal; Dobbőrökkel; Dobmodullal (elektronikus); Dobverőkkel; Hardverrel (állványokkal); Lábcintányér-állvánnyal; Lábgéppel (elektronikus); Gyakorló paddal; Karámrendszerrel; Csak dobtestek (állványok nélkül); Pergőállvánnyal; Dobszékkel; Egyéb
vi: Các mặt hàng đi kèm bộ trống: Bao gồm pedal trống bass; Bao gồm hộp/túi đựng; Bao gồm cymbal; Bao gồm mặt trống; Bao gồm mô-đun trống (điện tử); Bao gồm dùi trống; Bao gồm trang thiết bị (chân đỡ); Bao gồm chân đỡ hi-hat; Bao gồm (các) pedal trống kick (điện tử); Bao gồm đệm tập; Bao gồm hệ thống giá; Chỉ có bộ vỏ (chỉ gồm trống); Bao gồm chân đỡ snare; Bao gồm ghế ngồi; Khác
ko: 드럼 키트 포함 품목: 베이스 드럼 페달 포함; 휴대용 케이스/가방 포함; 심벌즈 포함; 드럼 헤드 포함; 드럼 모듈 포함 (전자식); 드럼 스틱 포함; 하드웨어 포함 (스탠드); 하이햇 스탠드 포함; 킥 페달 포함 (전자식); 연습용 패드 포함; 랙 시스템 포함; 쉘 팩 전용 (드럼 전용); 스네어 스탠드 포함; 드럼 의자 포함; 기타
pt-PT: Itens incluídos no kit de bateria: Pedal de bombo incluído; Sacos/estojos de transporte incluídos; Pratos incluídos; Peles de bateria incluídas; Módulo de bateria incluído (eletrónico); Baquetas incluídas; Ferragens incluídas (suportes); Suporte de pratos de choques incluído; Pedal(ais) de bombo incluído(s) (eletrónico); Pad de treino incluído; Sistema de rack incluído; Apenas o conjunto de cascos (apenas os tambores); Suporte de tarola incluído; Banco incluído; Outro
hr-HR: Stavke uključene u komplet bubnja: Uključena pedala za bas-bubanj; Uključene torbe / koferi za nošenje; Uključene činele; Uključene opne za bubnjeve; Uključen modul za bubnjeve (elektronički); Uključene palice za bubnjeve; Uključen hardver (stalci); Uključen stalak za hi-hat; Uključene pedale za kick (elektroničke); Uključena podloga za vježbanje; Uključen sustav okvira (rack); Samo set elemenata (samo bubnjevi); Uključen stalak za mali bubanj (snare); Uključen stolac; Ostalo
pt-BR: Itens incluídos no kit de tambores/bateria: Pedal de bumbo incluído; Bolsas/estojos de transporte incluídos; Pratos incluídos; Peles de bateria incluídas; Módulo de bateria incluído (eletrônica); Baquetas incluídas; Ferragens incluídas (suportes); Máquina de chimbal incluída; Pedal(is) de bumbo incluído(s) (eletrônica); Pad de estudo incluído; Sistema de rack incluído; Apenas cascos (só tambores); Estante de caixa incluída; Banco incluído; Outros
ru: Предметы, входящие в комплект ударной установки: Педаль для бас-барабана в комплекте; Кейсы/чехлы для переноски в комплекте; Тарелки в комплекте; Пластики в комплекте; Звуковой модуль в комплекте (электронная); Барабанные палочки в комплекте; Крепеж в комплекте (стойки); Стойка для хай-хэта в комплекте; Педаль(-и) для бас-барабана в комплекте (электронная); Тренировочный пэд в комплекте; Рама (rack system) в комплекте; Только барабаны (без хардвера); Стойка для малого барабана в комплекте; Стул в комплекте; Другое
zh-TW: 鼓組內含品項: 含大鼓踏板; 含攜行箱/袋; 含鈸; 含鼓皮; 含鼓音源機 (電子鼓); 含鼓棒; 含硬體 (支架); 含 Hi-hat 支架; 含大鼓踏板 (電子鼓); 含打點板; 含支架系統; 僅含鼓肚 (僅鼓); 含小鼓支架; 含鼓椅; 其他